Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202058-860
Nebraska Health Education Assistance Loan Program; bonds or other
obligations; how paid.

Notwithstanding section 58-841, all bonds, notes, or other obligations
issued by the authority for the Nebraska Health Education Assistance Loan
Program shall be payable out of the revenue generated in connection with loans
funded under sections 58-857
to 58-862, or from reserves or other money available for such
purpose as may be designated in the resolution of the authority under which
the bonds, notes, or other obligations are issued or as may be designated
in a trust indenture authorized by the authority.

Laws 1983, LB 159, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2957;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 57;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1757;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 60.